port-pronun/port-pronun.regex
[ s -> z || vowel _ vowel]
.o.
[ c h -> %$ ] 
.o.
[ c -> s || _ [e|i|é|í] ]
.o.
[ c -> k ] 
.o.
[ s s -> s 0 ]
.o.
[ z -> s || _ .#. ]
.o.
[ ç -> s ]
.o.				! break sibilants
[ l h -> L 0 ]
.o.
[ n h -> N 0]
.o.
[ h -> 0 ]
.o.
[ r r -> R 0 ]
.o.
[ r -> R || .#. _ ] 
.o.				! vowels
[ e -> i || _ .#. , .#. p _ r , _ s .#. ]
.o.
[ o -> u || _ .#. , _ s .#. ]
.o.				! palatals
[ t -> C || _ i ] 
.o.
[ d -> J || _ i ] ; 
